Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1122
Residential care, defined.

Residential care means food and lodging and any other related expenses which are not a part of the education program, but residential care does not include expenditures for medical or dental services. Expenditures for medical and dental services shall be the responsibility of the parent or legal guardian.

Laws 1987, LB 367, § 13;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3312;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 804.